Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-102
Property, defined.

The word property includes every kind of property, tangible or intangible, subject to ownership.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 3, p. 389;

R.S.1913, § 6291;

Laws 1921, c. 133, art. I, § 1, p. 545;

C.S.1922, § 5808;

C.S.1929, § 77-101;

R.S.1943, § 77-102.

Leasehold interest in buildings on federal air force base was property subject to taxation. Offutt Housing Co. v. County of Sarpy, 160 Neb. 320, 70 N.W.2d 382 (1955).

Term property includes intangible property. International Harvester Co. v. County of Douglas, 146 Neb. 555, 20 N.W.2d 620 (1945).

Lease for years is property, the subject of an independent assessment as the property of the lessee. North Platte Lodge 985, B.P.O.E. v. Board of Equalization of Lincoln County, 125 Neb. 841, 252 N.W. 313 (1934).

A cause of action sounding in tort is not property as that term is understood in the revenue law of the state. Seward County v. Jones, 105 Neb. 705, 181 N.W. 652 (1921).

Each station is assessed as independent business, and it may deduct from credits due all debts owing at time of return as regards that particular station, which net amount, if any, is taxed. Nye-Schneider-Fowler Co. v. Boone County, 102 Neb. 742, 169 N.W. 436 (1918).